Hawaii statutes.
[§183C-8] Zoning order; appeal to circuit
environmental court. Any final order of the department based upon this
[chapter] may be appealed to the circuit environmental court of the circuit in
which the land in question is found. The appeal shall be in accord with
chapter 91 and the Hawaii rules of civil procedure. [L 1994, c 270, pt of §1;
am L 2014, c 218, §8]

Rules of Court

Appeal to circuit court, see HRCP rule 72.

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next